en: Tube configuration: Matched pair; Octet; Quartet; Single tube; Other
hr-HR: Konfiguracija cijevi: Usklađeni par; Oktet; Kvartet; Jednostruka; Ostalo
ko: 튜브 구성: 일치하는 쌍; 팔중주; 사중주; 단일 튜브; 기타
da: Rørkonfiguration: Matchet par; Oktet; Kvartet; Enkelt rør; Andet
nl: Buisconfiguratie: Gekoppeld paar; Octet; Kwartet; Enkele buis; Andere
fr: Configuration du tube: Paire assortie; Octuor; Quatuor; Tube unique; Autre
sl-SI: Konfiguracija elektronke: Ujemajoči par; Oktet; Kvartet; Enojna cev; Drugo
sk-SK: Konfigurácia elektrónok: Zosúladený pár; Oktet; Kvarteto; Jedna trubica; Iné
pt-BR: Configuração do tubo: Par correspondente; Octeto; Quarteto; Tubo único; Outro
tr: Boru Yapılandırması: Eşleşen çift; Sekizli; Dörtlü; Tek tüp; Diğer
pl: Konfiguracja rury: Dopasowana para; Oktet; Kwartet; Pojedyncza rurka; Inne
fi: Putken konfiguraatio: Yhdistetty pari; Oktetti; Kvartetti; Yksi putki; Muu
bg-BG: Конфигурация на тръбата: Съвпадаща двойка; Октет; Квартет; Единична тръба; Други
es: Configuración de tubo: Par emparejado; Octeto; Cuarteto; Tubo único; Otros
ro-RO: Configurație tub: Pereche potrivită; Octet; Cvartet; Un singur tub; Altele
lt-LT: Vamzdelių konfigūracija: Deranti pora; Oktetas; Kvartetas; Vienas vamzdis; Kita
el: Διαμόρφωση σωλήνα: Ταιριαστό ζευγάρι; Οκταφωνία; Κουαρτέτο; Μονός σωλήνας; Άλλο
nb: Rørkonfigurasjon: Matchet par; Oktett; Kvartett; Enkeltrør; Annet
pt-PT: Configuração do tubo: Par combinado; Octeto; Quarteto; Tubo único; Outro
zh-TW: 管配置: 配對; 八重奏; 四重奏; 單管; 其他
hu: Cső konfigurációja: Egyező pár; Oktett; Kvartett; Egy cső; Egyéb
cs: Konfigurace lamp: Spárovaná dvojice; Oktet; Kvartet; Jedna trubka; Jiné
zh-CN: 管配置: 配对; 八位组; 四重奏; 单管; 其他
th: การกำหนดค่าท่อ: แบบคู่; แบบแปดท่อ; แบบสี่ท่อ; แบบท่อเดี่ยว; อื่นๆ
ru: Конфигурация ламп: Совпадающая пара; Октет; Квартет; Одна труба; Другой
it: Configurazione del tubo: Coppia abbinata; Ottetto; Quartetto; Tubo singolo; Altro
sv: Rörkonfiguration: Matchat par; Oktett; Kvartett; Enkelt rör; Övrigt
de: Röhrenkonfiguration: Passendes Paar; Oktett; Quartet; Einzelrohr; Sonstiges
ja: 真空管構成: 一致したペア; オクテット; カルテット; シングルチューブ; その他
vi: Hình dạng đèn ống: Cặp tương ứng; Điện toán; Nhóm tứ tấu; Ống đơn; Khác